Washington statutes.
RCW 9.61.250

Telephone harassment—Offense, where deemed committed.

Any offense committed by use of a telephone as set forth in RCW 9.61.230 may be deemed to have been committed either at the place from which the telephone call or calls were made or at the place where the telephone call or calls were received.

[ 1967 c 16 s 3.]